dictionaries/da_DK/da_DK.dic
abessinerkat/10,19,39,61
adoptivsøn/7,10,39,61
adverbiel/59,10,49,39
aftenluft/5,2,10,39,62
akut/59,10,49,39,31
angorakat/10,19,39,61
ansat/59,10,49,39
antiparallel/59,10,49,39,31
arbejdskamp/5,2,10,39,62
arbejdsom/40,49,10,39,59
argonaut/10,11,2,39,60
artsspecifik/59,10,49,39
baggårdskat/10,19,39,61
bakteriel/59,10,49,39
ballondyr/10,46,4,39,62
bedsteven/7,10,39,61
befrielseskamp/5,2,10,39,62
besat/59,10,49,39
beskærersaks/5,2,10,39,63
beskæresaks/5,2,10,39,63
betongris/5,2,10,39,63
biografaktuel/59,10,49,39
bjergluft/44,10,39,62
blågrøn/42,10,49,59,39
blåhvilling/10,11,2,39,63
blåskimmelost/5,2,10,39,63
blist/10,11,2,39,60
blomst/10,11,2,39,60
blomsterkost/5,2,10,39,63
blyant/10,11,2,39,62
bogaktuel/59,10,49,39
boligskat/7,10,39,61
boltsaks/5,2,10,39,63
bondestudent/10,11,2,39,60
bonekost/5,2,10,39,63
bonusloft/10,4,11,39,62
bonussøn/7,10,39,61
boost/10,46,4,39,60 al:boosts al:boosts'
bouillonterning/10,11,2,39,63
brak/42,10,49,59,39
brieost/5,2,10,39,63
broderesaks/5,2,10,39,63
brodersaks/5,2,10,39,63
brorsøn/7,10,39,61
brydekamp/5,2,10,39,62
buk/10,19,39,61
børnefilm/10,2,46,39,62
børneven/7,10,39,61
camembertost/5,2,10,39,63
celadongrøn/59,10,49,39
cheddarost/5,2,10,39,63
contortafyr/7,10,39,61
cowboyfilm/10,2,46,39,62
damekamp/5,2,10,39,62
datamaskinel/59,10,49,39
dattersøn/7,10,39,61
deroute/10,11,2,39,63
dessertost/5,2,10,39,63
diagonaldæk/10,47,39,62
differentiel/42,10,49,59,39
drik/10,19,39,61
drømmekamp/5,2,10,39,62
dybgrøn/42,10,49,59,39
dyreven/7,10,39,61
dødskamp/5,2,10,39,62
dødtræt/59,10,49,39
edderkop/7,10,39,61
ejdammerost/5,2,10,39,63
ejendomsværdiskat/7,10,39,61
eksistentiel/42,10,49,59,39
eksponentiel/59,10,49,39
eksven/7,10,39,61
emmentalerost/5,2,10,39,63
energidrik/10,19,39,62
enhjørning/10,11,2,39,63
etnokulturel/59,10,49,39
exceptionel/42,10,49,59,39
faktuel/59,10,49,39
fårekød/45,10,39,62
fåremælksost/5,2,10,39,63
fåreost/5,2,10,39,63
fåresaks/5,2,10,39,63
fasankok/10,19,39,61
fejekost/5,2,10,39,63
femkamp/5,2,10,39,62
fetaost/5,2,10,39,63
filmskat/10,19,39,61
finansskat/7,10,39,61
fjerdepart/10,11,2,39,62
fjerkræsaks/5,2,10,39,63
fjerlet/59,10,49,39
flint/44,10,39,63
flygtningeven/7,10,39,61
flæskesmåkød/45,10,39,62
flødeost/5,2,10,39,63
folkekulturel/59,10,49,39
forligspart/10,11,2,39,62
formueskat/7,10,39,61
fredsven/7,10,39,61
frihedskamp/5,2,10,39,62
friskost/5,2,10,39,63
frisørsaks/5,2,10,39,63
frygtsom/40,49,10,39,59
fugleven/7,10,39,61
fyr/10,19,39,61
fyringstrussel/64,65,10,34,39,62
færdigoversat/59,10,49,39
galmyg/10,48,39,61
gammelost/5,2,10,39,63
gåsegrib/10,19,39,61
gedeost/5,2,10,39,63
giftskat/7,10,39,61
gladiatorkamp/5,2,10,39,62
goudaost/5,2,10,39,63
gram/59,10,49,39
granaost/5,2,10,39,63
grensaks/5,2,10,39,63
grundskat/7,10,39,61
græstørv/10,2,46,39,62
grøn/42,10,49,59,39,31
grønskimmelost/5,2,10,39,63
gudsøn/7,10,39,61
hakkekød/45,10,39,62
halvtyk/59,10,49,39
hamp/44,10,39,63
handelsstudent/10,11,2,39,60
handlingsfilm/10,2,46,39,62
hankat/10,19,39,61
hat/10,19,39,61
havesaks/5,2,10,39,63
havluft/44,10,39,62
hestekød/45,10,39,62
hip/42,10,49,59,39
hjertensven/7,10,39,61
Hollywoodfilm/10,2,46,39,62
hunderæd/42,10,49,59,39
hundeven/7,10,39,61
husmandssøn/7,10,39,61
husvært/10,11,2,39,62
hvidløgsost/5,2,10,39,63
hvidskimmelost/5,2,10,39,63
hvidtekost/5,2,10,39,63
hvilling/10,11,2,39,63
hytteost/5,2,10,39,63
hækkesaks/5,2,10,39,63
hæksaks/5,2,10,39,63
hældningsgrad/10,11,2,39,62
høloft/10,4,11,39,62
høvding/5,2,10,39,63
høvding/10,11,2,39,63
immateriel/42,10,49,59,39
indekat/10,19,39,61
indiefilm/10,2,46,39,62
inkomplet/59,10,49,39
insulinpen/10,19,39,61
interpersonel/42,10,49,59,39
irrationel/42,10,49,59,39
isterning/10,11,2,39,63
jesuit/7,10,39,60
jetlag/10,47,39,62
Josefsøn/7,10,39,61
kalkkost/5,2,10,39,63
kancellistil/44,10,39,62
kardiel/59,10,49,39
kartoffelterning/10,11,2,39,63
kastanjedyr/10,46,4,39,62 ph:kastaniedyr
kat/10,19,39,61
kirkeskat/7,10,39,61
klint/10,11,2,39,63
klosaks/5,2,10,39,63
knast/10,11,2,39,63
knivstik/10,47,39,62
kok/10,19,39,61
kommenost/5,2,10,39,63
kommuneskat/7,10,39,61
kompositionel/42,10,49,59,39
konjunkturfølsom/59,10,49,39
koppear/10,47,39,62
kopskat/7,10,39,61
krigstrussel/64,65,10,34,39,62
kriminel/42,10,49,59,39
kronprins/10,11,2,39,63
kuglepen/10,19,39,61
kuling/10,11,2,39,62
kunstskat/10,19,39,61
kvalifikationskamp/5,2,10,39,62
kønsspecifik/59,10,49,39
lammegrib/10,19,39,61
lammekød/45,10,39,62
lapidarstil/44,10,39,62
lemming/10,11,2,39,63
linoleumstryk/10,47,39,62
livræd/42,10,49,59,39
lynrap/42,10,49,59,39
lyspen/10,19,39,61
læderslips/10,46,4,39,63
lægetidsskrift/10,4,11,39,62
løstansat/59,10,49,39
macadamianød/7,10,39,61
maggiterning/10,11,2,39,63
Maggiterning/10,11,2,39,63
majdrik/10,19,39,62
majmånedskat/10,19,39,61
manchego-ost/5,2,10,39,63
manchegoost/5,2,10,39,63
mangust/10,11,2,39,60
marekat/10,19,39,61
maternel/59,10,49,39
medieflip/10,47,39,62
mellemskat/7,10,39,61
mikrofilm/10,2,46,39,62
miljøskat/7,10,39,61
ministeriel/42,10,49,59,39
missekat/10,19,39,61
modpart/10,11,2,39,62
molerklint/10,11,2,39,63
mosgrøn/42,10,49,59,39
mozzarellaost/5,2,10,39,63
mugost/5,2,10,39,63
multimedieskat/7,10,39,61
myseost/5,2,10,39,63
mæt/42,10,49,59,39
nåde/44,10,39,62
nar/10,19,39,61
nat/58,10,39,61
nem/42,10,49,59,39
novellefilm/10,2,46,39,62
nænsom/40,49,10,39,59
nød/7,10,39,61
offerdyr/10,46,4,39,62
opmærksom/40,49,10,39,59
opvisningskamp/5,2,10,39,62
overenskomstansat/59,10,49,39
overstregningspen/10,19,39,61
parallel/59,10,49,39
parmesanost/5,2,10,39,63
påtryk/10,47,39,62
pen/10,19,39,61
penneven/7,10,39,61
perserkat/10,19,39,61
pistaciegrøn/42,10,49,59,39
plasticsøn/7,10,39,61
playoffkamp/5,2,10,39,62 ph:play-off-kamp ph:playoff-kamp
plejesøn/7,10,39,61
pornofilm/10,2,46,39,62
postindustriel/42,10,49,59,39
prof/59,10,49,39
proteindrik/10,19,39,62
præjudiciel/59,10,49,39
præstesøn/7,10,39,61
purim/10,39,62
quisling/5,2,10,39,63
racletteost/44,10,39,63
raf/59,10,49,39
realrenteskat/7,10,39,61
referentiel/59,10,49,39
renhedsgrad/10,11,2,39,62
retroseksuel/59,10,49,39
risdrik/10,19,39,62
roquefortost/5,2,10,39,63
rævesaks/5,2,10,39,63
sabbat/7,10,39,62
sabelkat/10,19,39,61
sådan/42,10,49,59,39
salatost/5,2,10,39,63
samarit/7,10,39,60
samaritan/10,11,2,39,60
sekskant/10,11,2,39,62
selskabsskat/7,10,39,61
senantik/59,10,49,39
silkeslips/10,46,4,39,63
sjæleven/7,10,39,61
skadedyr/10,46,4,39,62
skibskok/10,19,39,61
skidengrøn/59,10,49,39
skillingstryk/10,47,39,62
skinketerning/10,11,2,39,63
skoldkop/7,10,39,61
skræddersaks/5,2,10,39,63
skydetelt/4,10,5,39,62
skyndsom/40,49,10,39,59
skæreost/5,2,10,39,63
slutkamp/5,2,10,39,62
slutskat/7,10,39,61
slæk/42,10,49,59,39
smelteost/5,2,10,39,63
snaksom/40,49,10,39,59
snaps/5,2,10,39,63
snestorm/5,2,10,39,62
soldat/10,11,2,39,60
solsort/10,11,2,39,63
Sommertrekant/44,10,39,62
spatiel/59,10,49,39
sprængblyant/10,11,2,39,62
statsansat/59,10,49,39
statsskat/7,10,39,61
stenbuk/10,19,39,61
stoleryg/10,19,39,62
straffeprocessuel/42,10,49,59,39
strikkeopskrift/10,11,2,39,62
student/10,11,2,39,60
styg/42,10,49,59,39
støvekost/5,2,10,39,63
støvstorm/5,2,10,39,62
superficiel/59,10,49,39
sut/10,47,39,61
svigersøn/7,10,39,61
svinekød/45,10,39,62
sælsom/40,49,10,39,59
særskat/7,10,39,61
søn/7,10,39,61
søstersøn/7,10,39,61
talefilm/10,2,46,39,62
teenagersøn/7,10,39,61
telegramstil/44,10,39,62
temperaturfølsom/59,10,49,39
terning/10,11,2,39,63
tilskæresaks/5,2,10,39,63
tokant/10,11,2,39,62
topskat/7,10,39,61
torskedum/42,10,49,59,39
tranchersaks/5,2,10,39,63
trekant/10,11,2,39,62
trold/5,2,10,39,63
tromletyk/59,10,49,39
trækdyr/10,46,4,39,62
tungnem/42,10,49,59,39
tuschpen/10,19,39,61
tænksom/40,49,10,39,59
tømrerblyant/10,11,2,39,62
ubesat/59,10,49,39
udbytteskat/7,10,39,61
udvekslingsstudent/10,11,2,39,60
ugeaktuel/59,10,49,39
ultraviolet/59,10,49,39
underholdningsfilm/10,2,46,39,62
ungkok/10,19,39,61
uopfindsom/40,49,10,39,59
uskøn/42,10,49,59,39
uvis/42,10,49,59,39
valutapukkel/64,65,10,34,39,63
varebil/10,11,2,39,62
ven/7,10,39,61
venstreintellektuel/42,10,49,59,39
vinterdæk/10,47,39,62
virksom/40,49,10,39,59
wildwestfilm/10,2,46,39,62
